Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 4 Telecommunications and Competition Development

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“The Public Service Commission shall be required to conduct at least three hearings in locations outside the metropolitan areas of the state and accept evidence as to the costs, feasibility, and methodology of providing for toll free calling between two telephones where the central offices serving such telephones are within an extended area of service of not less than 22 miles of each other.
The methodology and analysis of the cost and feasibility of such toll free calling area shall be conducted under the supposition of an alternative system of regulation within the framework of Section 1 of this Act.
The commission shall conduct such hearings prior to November 30, 1995, and shall report its findings to the General Assembly no later than December 31, 1995.
The Public Service Commission shall conclude its consideration in Docket 4231-U of the expansion of local calling areas pursuant to its rules, including but not limited to all balloting and the formulation of an appropriate rate design, on or before January 1, 1996.
The implementation of the expanded calling areas shall be completed on or before July 1, 1996.”

Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 enactment of this article, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 333 (1995).

46-5-160.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “The Telecommunications and Competition Development Act of 1995.”

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-161.
Legislative findings; intent.

The General Assembly finds:

It is in the public interest to establish a new regulatory model for telecommunications services in Georgia to reflect the transition to a reliance on market based competition as the best mechanism for the selection and provision of needed telecommunications services at the most efficient pricing;

Investment in the telecommunications infrastructure required to further economic growth in Georgia and to meet the growing demands of Georgia’s consumers will be encouraged through competition; and

In order to ensure the implementation of this new reliance on market based competition, any legislative obstacles to competition for local exchange services must be removed.

It is the intent of this article to:

Permit local exchange companies to elect alternative forms of regulation;

Protect the consumer during the transition to a competitive telecommunications market;

Assure reasonable cost for universal access to basic telecommunications services throughout Georgia;

Encourage investment in Georgia’s telecommunications infrastructure and encourage the introduction of innovative products and services for Georgia’s consumers;

Authorize competition for local exchange services; and

Allow pricing flexibility for all telecommunications services other than basic local exchange services.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-162.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Alternative regulation” means a form of regulation pursuant to which the rates, terms, and conditions for telecommunications services provided by a local exchange company are set pursuant to the rules specified in this article.

“Basic local exchange services” or “universal access local exchange services” mean the provision to residential and single line business customers in Georgia of services composed of a touch tone switched access line and dial tone, of a quality sufficient for two way voice and 9600 baud data/fax communications. This service shall include 1+ dialing for access to competitive providers of telecommunications services by January 1, 1997. The elements of universal access local exchange services are subject to subsequent review and modification by the commission.

“Caller identification service” means a type of telephone service which permits telephone customers to see the telephone number of incoming telephone calls.

“Commission” means the Georgia Public Service Commission.

“Electing company” means a local exchange company subject to the alternative regulation described in this article.

“Fund” means the Universal Access Fund created in Code Section 46-5-167.

“Gross domestic product-price index” or “GDP-PI” means the gross domestic product fixed weight price index calculated by the United States Department of Commerce.

“Interconnection service” means the service of providing access to a local exchange company’s facilities for the purpose of enabling another telecommunications company to originate or terminate telecommunications service.

“Local calling area” means the geographic area encompassing one or more local exchanges as described in commission orders or in maps, tariffs, and rate schedules reviewed and approved by the commission.

“Local exchange company” means a telecommunications company authorized to provide local exchange service as described in this article. For purposes of this article, there shall be two categories of local exchange companies:

Tier 1 companies are those companies with 2 million or more access lines within Georgia holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission; and

Tier 2 companies are those companies with less than 2 million access lines within Georgia holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission.

“Local exchange services” means services offered for the transmission and utilization of two-way interactive communications and associated usage with the local calling area.

“Local interconnection services” means that part of switched interconnection service provided for the purpose of originating or terminating a call which originates and terminates within the local calling area.

“Portability” means the technical capability that permits a customer to retain the same local number at the same customer location regardless of the provider of the local exchange service.

“Switched access” means that part of switched interconnection service provided for the purpose of originating or terminating a toll service.

“Switched interconnection service” means that part of interconnection service which utilizes the local exchange company’s switching facilities to provide line or trunkside access or both to the local exchange company’s end office or tandem switches for the purpose of originating and terminating the telecommunications services of other telecommunications companies.

“Tariff” means the schedule or other writing filed with the commission that describes the rates, terms, and conditions of certain telecommunications services provided by the telecommunications company.

“Telecommunications company” means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or municipal, county, or local governmental entity offering telecommunications services to the public for hire.

“Telecommunications services” means the services for the transmission of two-way interactive communications to the public for hire. For purposes of illustration, the term “telecommunications services” includes without limitation local exchange services and interconnection services.

“Toll service” means the transmission of two-way interactive switched communications between local calling areas.

“Universal access provider” means a local exchange company that is obligated to provide basic local exchange service in all of its local calling areas in response to reasonable requests for such service and which, in consideration of such obligation, may have its rates for local switched interconnection service established as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “2” was substituted for “two” in subparagraphs (10)(A) and (10)(B).

46-5-163.
Certificates of authority.

A telecommunications company including a telecommunications services reseller shall not provide telecommunications services without a certificate of authority issued by the commission. The provisions of Code Section 46-5-45 shall apply in circumstances where a telecommunications company is providing telecommunications services without a certificate issued by the commission.

The commission shall have the authority to issue multiple certificates of authority for local exchange services upon a showing to the commission that an applicant possesses satisfactory financial and technical capability. Any certificate existing on July 1, 1995, shall remain effective and shall be considered a certificate of authority under this article. A certificate is not required for a telecommunications company to provide commercial mobile services. The commission shall also have the authority to issue certificates to long distance telecommunications carriers subject to federal court decisions, federal law, and regulations of the Federal Communications Commission.

A showing of public convenience and necessity is not a condition for issuing a competing certificate of authority. Prior to July 1, 1998, only a currently certificated Tier 2 local exchange company may be issued a certificate of authority to compete for service in an area serviced by an existing Tier 2 local exchange company.

Any certificate of authority issued by the commission is subject to revocation, suspension, or adjustment where the commission finds upon complaint and hearing that a local exchange company has engaged in unfair competition or has abused its market position.

The commission shall grant certificates of authority in a timely manner and all such proceedings on complaints regarding abuse shall be resolved in a timely manner.

All local exchange companies certificated by the commission shall be subject to the same rules and regulations applied by the commission to other local exchange companies certificated to provide local exchange services within the same area; provided, however, that in promulgating rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article, the commission may adopt rules and regulations for local exchange companies certificated after July 1, 1995, which vary from other rules and regulations applicable to the delivery of telecommunications services but which are appropriate and consistent to service being delivered by such local exchange companies and are adopted in the public interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-164.
Interconnection among certificated local exchange companies.

All local exchange companies shall permit reasonable interconnection with other certificated local exchange companies. This subsection includes all or portions of such services as needed to provide local exchange services.

The rates, terms, and conditions for such interconnection services shall not unreasonably discriminate between providers and shall be negotiated in good faith between the providers and filed with the commission.

In the event that such rates, terms, or conditions cannot be negotiated by the parties, the commission shall determine the reasonable rates, terms, or conditions for the interconnection services.

Such interconnection services shall be provided for intrastate services on an unbundled basis similar to that required by the FCC for services under the FCC’s jurisdiction.

The commission is authorized to allow local exchange companies to resell the services purchased from other local exchange companies pursuant to rules determining when and under what circumstances such resale shall be allowed; provided, however, that the resale of basic local exchange services supported by the Universal Access Fund shall be limited to users and uses conforming to the definition of basic local exchange services set forth in paragraph (2) of Code Section 46-5-162. Any local exchange company or telecommunications company desiring to purchase or to resell services purchased from another local exchange company may petition the commission for the authorization to purchase or to resell such services. In cases where the purchase or resale of services purchased is authorized by the commission, the commission shall determine the reasonable rates, terms, or conditions for the purchase or resale of such local exchange services such that no local exchange company or telecommunications company gains an unfair market position. The commission shall render a final decision in any proceeding initiated pursuant to the provisions of this subsection no later than 60 days after the close of the record except that the commission, by order, may extend such period in any case in which it shall find that the complexity of the issues and the length of the record require an extension of such period, in which event the commission shall render a decision at the earliest date practicable. In no event shall the commission delay the rendering of a final decision in such proceeding beyond the earlier of 120 days after the close of the record or 180 days from the filing of the notice of petition under this subsection. The commission, at its discretion or upon a petition filed by either party, may modify a ruling rendered under this subsection, provided that a petition for modification may not be filed more than once in any 18 month period.

The basic local exchange services of Tier 2 local exchange companies may be purchased by competing providers at the tariffed rate, provided such reselling does not result in the loss of intrastate or interstate revenues to the selling company for the individual service being resold. This subsection does not apply to Tier 2 local exchange companies that have switched access rates that are lower than or at parity with the same local exchange company’s interstate switched access rates.

The commission shall have the authority to require local exchange companies to provide additional interconnection services and unbundling.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-165.
Alternative regulation of rates, terms, and conditions.

Any Tier 1 local exchange company may elect to have its rates, terms, and conditions for its services determined pursuant to the alternative regulation described in this article, in lieu of other forms of regulation including but not limited to rate of return or rate base monitoring or regulation, upon the filing of notice with the commission and committing to provide basic local exchange services upon reasonable request and to invest $500 million per year for five years to improve and strengthen telecommunications services in Georgia; provided, however, that after the expiration of three years of such investments, the commission shall determine, after notice and opportunity for a Tier 1 local exchange company or other interested parties to be heard, whether such investment commitment should be continued for the remaining two years or whether such commitment should be reduced.

Any Tier 2 local exchange company may elect to have the rates, terms, and conditions for its services determined pursuant to the alternative regulation described in this article upon the filing of notice with the commission and committing to provide basic local exchange services upon reasonable request.

The alternative regulation under this article shall become effective on the date specified by the electing company but in no event sooner than 30 days after such notice is filed with the commission.

On the date a telecommunications company elects the alternative regulation described in this article, all existing rates, terms, and conditions for the services provided by the electing company contained in the then existing tariffs and contracts are deemed just and reasonable.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-166.
Rates for switched access.

An electing company, as defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 46-5-162, shall set rates on a basis that does not unreasonably discriminate between similarly situated customers; provided, however, that all such rates are subject to a complaint process for abuse of market position in accordance with rules to be promulgated by the commission.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rates for switched access by each Tier 1 local exchange company shall be no higher than the rates charged for interstate access by the same local exchange company. The rates for switched access shall be negotiated in good faith between the parties. In the event that the rates for switched access cannot be negotiated between the parties, any party may petition the commission to set reasonable rates, terms, or conditions for switched access. The commission shall render a final decision in any proceeding initiated pursuant to the provisions of this subsection no later than 60 days after the close of the record except that the commission, by order, may extend such period in any case in which it shall find that the complexity of the issues and the length of the record require an extension of such period, in which event the commission shall render a decision at the earliest date practicable. In no event shall the commission delay the rendering of a final decision in such proceeding beyond the earlier of 120 days after the close of the record or 180 days from the filing of the notice of petition for determination of rates for switched access that initiated the proceeding.

Beginning January 1, 2011, and ending December 31, 2015, each Tier 2 local exchange company shall adjust in equal annual increments its intrastate switched access charges to parity with its similar interstate switched access rates. The commission shall have authority to govern the transition of Tier 2 local exchange company switched access rates to their corresponding interstate levels and the commission shall allow adjustment of basic local exchange services or universal access funds, as necessary to recover those revenues, based on calendar year 2008, lost through the concurrent reduction of the intrastate switched access rates. In the event that the rates for switched access cannot be negotiated in good faith between the parties, the commission shall determine the reasonable rates for switched access in accordance with the procedures provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. Any Tier 2 local exchange company that is an electing company may elect to become subject to rate of return regulation by certification to the commission of this election no later than December 31, 2010. A Tier 2 local exchange company making this election is prohibited from making a subsequent election to have the rates, terms, and conditions for its services determined pursuant to the alternative regulation described in subsection (b) of Code Section 46-5-165 prior to January 1, 2016.

Beginning January 1, 2011, and ending December 31, 2020, each telecommunications company holding a certificate of authority or otherwise authorized to provide telecommunications services in this state other than a Tier 2 local exchange company shall adjust in equal annual increments its intrastate switched access charges to parity with its similar interstate switched access rates.

In accordance with rules to be promulgated by the commission, any telecommunications company providing intrastate switched access services shall file tariffs with the commission for intrastate switched access services and other applicable services that state the terms and conditions of such services and the rates as established pursuant to this Code section.

The commission shall review the intrastate switched access rates as set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section and shall report the results of its findings and any actions taken to the General Assembly by or before December 31, 2011. Thereafter, the commission shall include in its annual report to the General Assembly required under Code Section 46-5-174 the status of any intrastate switched access rate changes under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-166

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 3/HB 168.

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 4, 2010, rewrote this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1) Update and modernize Georgia’s telecommunications laws to encourage competition and bring about lower prices and better services for the consumer;

“(2) Make Georgia a more attractive place for telecommunications investment and encourage the deployment of advanced technologies;

“(3) Create and preserve jobs for Georgia workers; and

“(4) Reduce the subsidies paid by Georgia consumers.

“It is not the intent of the General Assembly to impose any fee or other charge on Georgia consumers.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the ‘Telecom Jobs and Investment Act.’”

46-5-167.
Universal Access Fund.

The commission shall administer a Universal Access Fund to assure the provision of reasonably priced access to basic local exchange services throughout Georgia. The fund shall be administered by the commission pursuant to this Code section and under rules to be promulgated by the commission as needed to assure that the fund operates in a competitively neutral manner between competing telecommunications providers.

All telecommunications companies holding a certificate of authority issued by the commission to provide services within Georgia shall contribute quarterly to the fund as provided in this subsection. The commission shall determine the manner of contribution using either one or a combination of the following two contribution methodologies:

A charge for each working telephone number; or

A proportionate amount based on each company’s gross intrastate revenues from the provision of telecommunications services to end users.

In calculating such contributions, the commission shall allow a local exchange company holding a certificate of authority issued by the commission after July 1, 1995, and before January 1, 2010, with primary headquarters in Georgia and more than 750 full-time employees working in Georgia as of January 1, 2010, to utilize accumulated unexpired Georgia net operating losses for taxable years ending prior to January 1, 2010, on a full dollar-for-dollar basis to reduce up to 50 percent of its contribution to the Universal Access Fund. Within the same tax year of the election, companies making such election shall formally notify the Department of Revenue that the company agrees to forego any rights or claims to the Georgia net operating losses so used. The commission may allow any telecommunications company certified as a competitive local exchange carrier to request a hearing seeking relief from this contribution requirement upon application, demonstration, and good cause shown that such competitive local exchange carrier does not receive a benefit from the reduction in intrastate switched access charges pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 46-5-166.

Contributions to the fund shall be determined if, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission calculates the difference in the reasonable actual costs of basic local exchange services throughout Georgia and the maximum amounts that may be charged for such services and shall also account for reductions in intrastate switched access charges pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 46-5-166.

Nothing in this subsection shall require any Tier 2 local exchange company to raise any of its rates. Nothing in this subsection shall authorize any Tier 2 local exchange company to receive any subsidy from the Universal Access Fund. For purposes of this subsection, the term “subsidy” means any payment authorized by paragraph (2) of this subsection in excess of the intrastate access charge reductions pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 46-5-166.

After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that shall be distributed quarterly. Such determination shall be made as follows:

Distributions to carriers that have reduced intrastate switched access charges pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 46-5-166 shall be limited to an amount reflective of such access charge reductions and shall also be reduced by the amount per access line, which if added to the carrier’s basic local exchange service rate, in accordance with a schedule established by the commission, results in an amount that would be equal to 110 percent of the July 1, 2009, residential state-wide weighted average rate for basic local exchange services imputed across all access lines and adjusted annually for inflation measured by the change in GDP-PI. Any distributions pursuant to this subparagraph shall be limited to a period of no more than ten years; and

Except for those distributions to Tier 2 local exchange companies that have reduced intrastate switched access charges pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 46-5-166, distributions to a Tier 2 local exchange carrier subject to rate of return regulation shall also be reduced by the amount per access line, which if added to the carrier’s basic local exchange service rate, in accordance with a schedule established by the commission, results in an amount that would be equal to 110 percent of the July 1, 2009, residential state-wide weighted average rate for basic local exchange services imputed across all access lines and adjusted annually for inflation measured by the change in GDP-PI. The commission shall determine any such distributions upon application, demonstration, and good cause shown that the reasonable actual costs to provide basic local exchange services exceed the maximum fixed price permitted for such basic local exchange services; any distributions pursuant to this subparagraph shall be limited to a period of no more than 20 years.

The commission shall require any local exchange company seeking reimbursement from the fund pursuant to subparagraph (d)(2)(B) of this Code section to file the information reasonably necessary to determine the actual and reasonable costs of providing basic local exchange services.

The commission shall have the authority to make adjustments to the contribution or distribution levels based on yearly reconciliations and to order further contributions or distributions as needed between companies to equalize reasonably the burdens of providing basic local exchange service throughout Georgia.

A local exchange company or other company shall not establish a surcharge on customers’ bills to collect contributions required under this Code section without first submitting to the Public Service Commission the methodology and data used by such company for approval by the commission and upon a showing to the commission that the surcharge does not result in an increase in the company’s service rates; provided, however, that such company shall not be required to submit for approval separate line items or surcharges that are specifically authorized or required by federal law or other provisions of state law.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-167

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 4/HB 168; Ga. L. 2012, p. 674, § 1/HB 332.

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 4, 2010, rewrote this Code section.

The 2012 amendment,

effective January 1, 2013, in subsection (g), deleted “from customers’ ” following “bills to collect” and added the language beginning “without first submitting” and ending with “provisions of state law” at the end.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1) Update and modernize Georgia’s telecommunications laws to encourage competition and bring about lower prices and better services for the consumer;

“(2) Make Georgia a more attractive place for telecommunications investment and encourage the deployment of advanced technologies;

“(3) Create and preserve jobs for Georgia workers; and

“(4) Reduce the subsidies paid by Georgia consumers.

“It is not the intent of the General Assembly to impose any fee or other charge on Georgia consumers.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the ‘Telecom Jobs and Investment Act.’”

46-5-168.
Jurisdiction and authority of commission.

The jurisdiction of the commission under this article shall be construed to include the authority necessary to implement and administer the express provisions of this article through rule-making proceedings and orders in specific cases.

The commission’s jurisdiction shall include the authority to:

Adopt reasonable rules governing certification of local exchange companies;

Grant, modify, impose conditions upon, or revoke a certificate;

Establish and administer the Universal Access Fund including modifications to the maximum allowable charge for basic local exchange service;

Adopt reasonable rules governing service quality;

Resolve complaints against a local exchange company regarding that company’s service;

Require a telecommunications company electing alternative regulation under this article to comply with the rate adjustment provisions of this article;

Approve and if necessary revise, suspend, or deny tariffs in accordance with the provisions of this article;

If necessary, elect another comparable measurement of inflation calculated by the United States Department of Commerce;

Establish reasonable rules and methodologies for performing cost allocations among the services provided by a telecommunications company; and

Direct telecommunications companies to make investments and modifications necessary to enable portability.

The commission shall render a final decision in any proceeding initiated pursuant to the provisions of this article no later than 60 days after the close of the record except that the commission, by order, may extend such period in any case in which it shall find that the complexity of the issues and the length of the record require an extension of such period, in which event the commission shall render a decision at the earliest date practicable. In no event shall the commission delay the rendering of a final decision in such proceeding beyond the earlier of 120 days after the close of the record or 180 days from the filing of the notice of rulemaking, petition, or complaint that initiated the proceeding.

In conducting any rule-making proceeding under this article, the commission shall consider the following factors:

The extent to which cost-effective competitive alternatives are available to existing telecommunications networks and services; and

Requirements necessary to prevent any disadvantage or economic harm to consumers, protect universal affordable service, establish and maintain an affordable Universal Access Fund, protect the quality of telecommunications services, prevent anticompetitive practices, and prevent abandonment of service to areas where there is no competing provider of telecommunications service.

Subject to any other provision of law protecting the confidentiality of trade secrets, the commission shall have access to the books and records of telecommunications companies as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this article and with the commission’s rules and regulations and to carry out its responsibilities under this article.

In order to promote economic development and competitive advantage for the State of Georgia, the commission shall have the authority to petition, intervene, or otherwise commence proceedings before the appropriate federal agencies and courts having specific jurisdiction over the regulation of telecommunications seeking to enhance the competitive market for telecommunications services within the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-168

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-169.
Company obligations associated with alternative regulation.

A company electing alternative regulation:

Shall comply with orders issued and rules adopted by the commission to implement the express provisions of this article as a condition of obtaining or retaining a certificate of authority under this article;

Shall not refuse any reasonable application for basic local exchange service;

Shall not give any unreasonable preference or advantage to any customer when providing telecommunications services;

Shall not, either directly or through affiliated companies, engage in any anticompetitive act or practice including but not limited to price squeezing, price discrimination, predatory pricing, or tying arrangements, as such terms are commonly applied in antitrust law;

Shall not cross-subsidize nonregulated or alternatively regulated services with revenue created by regulated services;

Shall not give any preference to affiliated companies;

Shall allow the resale of its services. Nothing in this Code section shall restrict a customer from authorizing an agent to order such services on its behalf; and

Shall not be required to seek regulatory approval of its depreciation rates or schedules.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-169

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-170.
Access to local telephone numbering resources and assignments.

Providers of local exchange services shall have access to local telephone numbering resources and assignments on equitable terms that include recognition of the scarcity of such resources and that are in accordance with adopted national assignment guidelines and commission rules. Additionally, all local exchange companies shall make the necessary modifications to allow portability of local numbers between different certificated providers of local exchange service as soon as reasonably possible after such portability has been shown to be technically and economically feasible and in the public interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-171.
Local call charges based on duration or time of call prohibited.

A local exchange company may not charge a residential customer or single line business for basic local exchange service based on the duration of a call or on the time of day that a call is made; provided, however, that such restriction shall not apply in any case where a customer or business requests charges based on the duration of a call or on the time of day that a call is made. This Code section does not prohibit a local exchange company from offering discounts based on the time of day that a call is made if the company also offers basic local exchange service at a rate permitted under Code Section 46-5-166.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-171

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-171.1.
Written authorization required by customer prior to being charged for service initiated by a third party.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, no telecommunications company shall charge a customer for any service which is provided to the customer by a nonaffiliated third party until such third party has certified to the telecommunications company that the third party has received the customer’s written authorization for such charges. When a customer initiates a new type of such third-party service or changes the type or types of such third-party service received, the invoice for such new or changed services must state the charges for such services in a clear, conspicuous, separate, and distinct manner so as to ensure that the customer is aware of the new or changed charges. Any telecommunications company that charges a customer for a service which is provided to the customer by a nonaffiliated third party must provide to such customer the ability to block the nonaffiliated third-party service and any charges associated with such service.

This Code section shall not apply to any transaction between a customer and that customer’s selected provider of basic local exchange, inter-LATA, or intra-LATA telecommunications services or initial requests to subscribe to such services; wireless services; requests for a change in a customer’s provider of local exchange service or a change in a customer’s primary interexchange inter-LATA or intra-LATA carrier; or customer initiated use of abbreviated dialing codes or other pay-per-use services.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-171.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1378, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 318, § 1/HB 302.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, added the last sentence in subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “customer initiated” was substituted for “customer-initiated” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1378, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1998, and shall apply to services which are initiated or changed after that date.”

46-5-172.
Annual report of Tier 1 company’s investment commitment.

A Tier 1 local exchange company shall provide an annual report with quarterly updates to the commission regarding its investment commitment as prescribed in subsection (a) of Code Section 45-5-165. Contributions to infrastructure for distance learning and telemedicine by a Tier 1 local exchange company shall be considered an investment credit toward the required investment commitment of such Tier 1 company.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-172

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-173.
Unpublished telephone identification.

Any person that obtains an unpublished telephone identification using a telephone caller identification service may not do any of the following without the written consent of the customer of the unpublished telephone line identification:

Intentionally disclose the unpublished telephone line identification to another person for purposes of resale or commercial gain;

Intentionally use the unpublished telephone line identification to solicit business; or

Intentionally disclose the unpublished telephone line identification through a computer data base, on-line bulletin board, or other similar mechanism.

Each intentional disclosure or use of an unpublished telephone line identification is a separate violation. A person other than a corporation who violates subsection (a) of this Code section may be required by the commission to pay a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00. A corporation that violates subsection (a) of this Code section may be required by the commission to pay a civil penalty of not more than $50,000.00.

The commission shall promulgate rules to further establish privacy guidelines applicable to telecommunications services.

No provider of telephone caller identification service shall be held liable for violations of this article committed by other persons or corporations.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-173

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.

46-5-174.
Commission’s annual report to General Assembly.

The commission shall report to the General Assembly annually on the status of the transition to alternative regulation of telecommunications services in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-174

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 886, § 2.